Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
24-229
Counsel for
Discipline Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The
Counsel for Discipline Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be established
within the Supreme
Court and administered by the State Court Administrator. The fund shall consist
of a portion of the annual membership dues assessed by the Nebraska State
Bar Association and remitted to the Supreme
Court for credit to the fund. Except as otherwise directed by the Supreme
Court during the period from November 21, 2009, until June 30, 2011, the fund
shall only be used to pay the costs associated with the operation of the Office
of the Counsel for Discipline. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2007, LB322, § 1;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 11.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.